src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_KOALVAK
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_KOALVAK ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_KAQLBB
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:%^PAL ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_KAQLBB ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_LUUBBYL
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:%^Pen%^V2VV ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_LUUBBYL ;

LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_MUORYZH
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:âž ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_MUORYZH ;
LEXICON PROP_MUORYZH-PL
: NMN_MUORYZH-WITH/WITHOUT-PAL-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_TOOBDYLM !!= * @CODE@ toobdâlm:toobdâlm
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:âž ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_TOOBDYLM ;

LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_PESS
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_PESS ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_PIISSUZH
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:už ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_PIISSUZH ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_PLAAN
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_PLAAN ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_AACCIKH
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_AACCIKH ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_ALGG
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_ALGG ;


LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_SOAOABBAR
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:%^Pen%^V2VV ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_SOAOABBAR ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_MEERSAZH
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:až ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_MEERSAZH ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_SAQPPLI
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:i ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_SAQPPLI ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_LOAQDD
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:%^PAL ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_LOAQDD ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_OAQLGA
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_OAQLGA ;

LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_MERJA
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_MERJA ;
LEXICON	 PROP_SEM/MAL_TERHI
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_TERHI ;
LEXICON	PROP_SEM/MAL_JOUSTE
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_JOUSTE ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_OULU
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_OULU ;
LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_RADIO
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_RADIO ;


!LEXICON PROP_SEM/SUR_
!+Sem/Sur: # ;

LEXICON PROP_PAPP_sur
! This works for surnames in -off
+Sem/Sur: NMN_PAPP ;

LEXICON PROP_SEM/SUR_MERJA
+Sem/Sur: NMN_MERJA ;

LEXICON	PROP_SEM/SUR_TERHI
+Sem/Sur: NMN_TERHI ;

LEXICON PROP_SEM/SUR_RADIO
+Sem/Sur: NMN_RADIO ;
!
!LEXICON PROP_SAJOS
!: NMN_SAJOS ;

!LEXICON NMN_TOLL-PLC
! This is copied from NMN_TOLL, but with the following modifications.
! plural: no
! possessive: no
! essive: no
! commitative: no
! diminutive derivations: no
! SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM -> SG-ABE/ACC/GEN

!! like KÕÕNJÂL 
! foot: 2syll
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: no
! consonant: geminate-single
! gradation: yes2
! weak_grade: single
! strong_grade: no
! Sg.Loc: âst
! Sg.Ill: palatalization-AND-e
!! ## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
!! ## 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
!!  â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
!! ## 1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!!  Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!!  Not Palatalized: ELSE
!!    Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
!!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! ## FORMS
!! * Yaml: **N-kidd, N-soll, N-toll, N-vorr**
!! strong_geminate, short_vowel, no_palatalization, high_stem_vowel 
! R ;	  !!= * @CODE@ toll
!: SG-NOM ;	    	  !!= * @CODE@ toll
!! :%>â ESS ;    		  = * @CODE@ tollân
!:%>â PAR ;		  !!= * @CODE@ tollâd
!! strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization, high_stem_vowel
!:%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;   	  !!= * @CODE@ toʹlle
!! single_consonant, long_vowel, no_palatalization, high_stem_vowel
!! :%^V2VV%^CC2C SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;	= * @CODE@ tool
!:%^V2VV%^CC2C SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	!!= * @CODE@ tool
!:%^V2VV%^CC2C%>â SG-LOC ;               !!= * @CODE@ toolâst
!! :%^V2VV%^CC2C SG-COM_IN ;               = * @CODE@ toolin
!! :%^V2VV%^CC2C PL-OBL ;	                = * @CODE@ tooli, toolid, toolid, toolin, toolivuiʹm, toolitaa

! +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^CC2C N_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;  = * @CODE@ tool-
! !! single_consonant, long_vowel, palatalization, high_stem_vowel
! +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C N_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL ;  = * @CODE@ tooʹl-

! HatY-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
! :%^V2VV%^CC2C HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ;
! :%^V2VV%^CC2C HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ;
! :%^CC2C SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;
!  HatY-STEM-PX-STENGTHEN ;




!LEXICON NMN_KUSS-PLC
! This is copied from NMN_KUSS, but with the following modifications.
! plural: no
! possessive: no
! essive: no
! commitative: no
! diminutive derivations: no
! SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM -> SG-ABE/ACC/GEN

! foot: 2syll
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: no
! consonant: geminate
! gradation: yes2
! weak_grade: geminate
! strong_grade: no
! Sg.Loc: âst
! Sg.Ill: palatalization-AND-e
!! ## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
!! ## 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
!!  â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
!! ## 1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!!  Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!!  Not Palatalized: ELSE
!!    Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
!!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! ## FORMS
!! * Yaml: **N-kuss**
!! 
!! R ;		= * @CODE@ kuss
!: SG-NOM ;	    		!!= * @CODE@ kuss
!! :%>â ESS ;     		 = * @CODE@ kussân
!:%>â PAR ;			!!= * @CODE@ kussâd
!:%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;    		!!= * @CODE@ kuʹsse
!:%^V2VV%^KK2GG SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		!!= * @CODE@ kuuzz
!:%^V2VV%^KK2GG%>â SG-LOC ;	!!= * @CODE@ kuuzzâ
! :%^V2VV%^KK2GG SG-COM_IN ;	= * @CODE@ kuuzzin
! :%^V2VV%^KK2GG PL-OBL ;	= * @CODE@ kuuzzi, kuuzzid, kuuzzid, kuuzzin, !kuuzzivuiʹm, kuuzzitaa
!+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^KK2GG N_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ kuuzz-
!+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL%^KK2GG N_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ kuuʹzz-

! HatY-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
! :%^V2VV%^KK2GG HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ;
! :%^V2VV%^KK2GG HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ;
! :%^KK2GAllegro SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;
!  HatY-STEM-PX-STENGTHEN ;


LEXICON ATTESTED-TOPONYM-STEM
+Cmp#:%-# TOPONYMS_NEWWORDS ;
+Cmp#:%-# N_Prop_Toponyms_sms2x ;
@U.Cap.Opt@+Der+Der/neqkh+N:@U.Cap.Opt@%>nẹ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}ǩ N_KAADHNEKH ;

LEXICON ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM
+Cmp#+N:%-# FEMALE-CLASSIFIERS ; 

LEXICON ATTESTED-MALE-STEM
+Cmp#+N:%-# MALE-CLASSIFIERS ; 


LEXICON PROP_KAADHNEKH
: NMN_KAADHNEKH ; ! Perhaps rather without PL


LEXICON PROP_SEM/MAL_KAAQLLES
+Sem/Mal: NMN_KAAQLLES ; ! Perhaps rather without PL

LEXICON PROP_VUYSPPOAQD !!= * @CODE@ vuâsppåʹd:vuâsppå%^1VOWd
: NMN_VUYSPPOAQD ;
